Utah statutes.
63B-11-504.   Manner of issuance -- Amounts, interest, and maturity.

(1)  Bonds issued under this chapter may be authorized, sold, and issued at times and in a manner determined by the commission by resolution.

(2)  Bonds may be issued in one or more series, in amounts, and shall bear dates, interest rates, including a variable rate, and maturity dates as the commission determines by resolution.

(3)  A bond issued may not mature later than 15 years after the dated date of the bonds.



Enacted by Chapter 266, 2002 General Session

